Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-12] Immunity. (a) The
lieutenant governor and employees of the office of the lieutenant governor
shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constitute a waiver of any
immunity of the State, and no action or failure to act under this chapter shall
be construed to create any liability for the State or its officers or employees
for the recovery of any damages caused by any action or failure to act. [L
2016, c 78, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next